Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 6. American Indian Education Programs

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 200, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 21-4-601.
Education programs on the Wind River Indian Reservation.

The legislature finds that, through education programs provided by the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the Northern Arapaho Tribe, or the cooperative tribal governing body to school age Indian children residing on the Wind River Indian Reservation, the state can address conditions of unemployment, poverty and lack of adequate job skills which exist on the reservation. Maintenance of these education programs unique to Indian students is of mutual benefit to the tribes and the state, reducing future financial needs of those students as tribal members and as Wyoming residents for public education, job services, substance abuse services and income supplements.

Subject to amounts appropriated by the legislature, the state superintendent of public instruction shall enter into negotiations with the individual business councils of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho tribes or the cooperative tribal governing body to determine the appropriate contractual arrangements for the provision of education programs and services addressing Indian students at risk of failure in school and other programs and services essential to the success and welfare of these students as specified under subsection (a) of this section. Contractual arrangements entered into under this subsection shall include a requirement that the expenditure of contractual amounts, as verified annually in writing, is for programs tied to improvement of student performance on the statewide assessment. For purposes of this section, the state superintendent shall include an amount within his biennial budget request which is computed in accordance with subsection (c) of this section to provide a per student amount that when nonstate funding sources are considered, is comparable to per student amounts provided for public schools under the Wyoming education resource block grant model.

To arrive at a biennial funding amount for purposes of subsection (b) of this section, an estimate shall be computed as follows:

Determine a combined average per student funding level under the Wyoming education resource block grant model for Fremont County school districts number fourteen (14), number twenty-one (21) and number thirty-eight (38);

Multiply the per student amount determined under paragraph (i) of this subsection by the number of students enrolled in education programs and services provided by the cooperative tribal governing body or each individual tribe pursuant to subsection (a) of this section;

Subtract from the amount computed under paragraph (ii) of this subsection all Federal Bureau of Indian Affairs funds for K-12 programs received by the cooperative tribal governing body or each individual tribe for education programs and services provided under subsection (a) of this section.

The cooperative tribal governing body or each individual business council shall annually report to the governor and the state superintendent of public instruction on the expenditure of contractual amounts as required under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 200, § 1; 2009, ch. 29, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2019 ch. 102, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

in (b), substituted “state superintendent of public instruction” for “governor” in the first sentence, and substituted “state superintendent” for “governor” in the last sentence.

Laws 2009, ch. 29, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2009.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent of public instruction” in (b) and (d); substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in the last sentence of (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent for public instruction” or similar language for “director” in the (a) and (d).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

in (d), substituted "governor and the state superintendent of public instruction" for "governor, the state superintendent of public instruction, the joint education interim committee and the select committee on tribal relations."

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (a), substituted “Tribe” for “and” following “Shoshone” and “Tribe, or the cooperative tribal governing body” for “Indian Tribes” following “Arapaho”; in the first sentence of (b), deleted “or joint” following “individual,” deleted “Indian” following “Arapaho,” added “or the cooperative tribal governing body”; substituted “cooperative tribal governing body or each individual tribe” for “joint business council” in (c)(ii) and (c)(iii); in (d), substituted “cooperative tribal governing body or each individual” for “joint,” deleted “of the Eastern Shoshone and the Northern Arapaho Indian Tribes” following “council”; and made stylistic changes.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 102 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 200, § 2, provides as follows:

“One million forty-nine thousand nine hundred forty-six dollars ($1,049,946.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the office of the governor to fund contractual obligations through the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30, 2008.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-4-602.
American Indian educational program.

The state board through the department of education shall, in cooperation with tribes of the region including the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes, evaluate and review existing state social studies content and performance standards to ensure the cultural heritage, history and contemporary contributions of American Indians are addressed in the Wyoming social studies content and performance standards.

The department shall, in consultation with tribes of the region including the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes, make available materials and resources on the department’s official web site to assist school districts in meeting social studies benchmarks within Wyoming social studies content and performance standards relating to the study of American Indian tribes.

History.

2017 ch. 182, § 1, effective March 9, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 182, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2017.